Tennessee, session 114, HB0627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-4-107, is amended by deleting the
language "three (3) years" and substituting instead "four (4) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0627
002483
- 1 -